Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-701.03
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 54-701 to 54-753.05, 54-797 to 54-7,103, and 54-7,105 to 54-7,108:

(1) Accredited veterinarian means a veterinarian approved by the deputy administrator of the United States Department of Agriculture in accordance with 9 C.F.R. part 161, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2006;

(2) Animal means all vertebrate members of the animal kingdom except humans or wild animals at large;

(3) Bureau of Animal Industry means the Bureau of Animal Industry of the Department of Agriculture of the State of Nebraska and includes the State Veterinarian, deputy state veterinarian, veterinary field officers, livestock inspectors, investigators, and other employees of the bureau;

(4) Dangerous disease means a disease transmissible to and among livestock which has the potential for rapid spread, serious economic impact or serious threat to livestock health, and is of major importance in the trade of livestock and livestock products;

(5) Department means the Department of Agriculture of the State of Nebraska;

(6) Director means the Director of Agriculture of the State of Nebraska or his or her designee;

(7) Domesticated cervine animal means any elk, deer, or other member of the family cervidae legally obtained from a facility which has a license, permit, or registration authorizing domesticated cervine animals which has been issued by the state where the facility is located and such animal is raised in a confined area;

(8) Exotic animal means any animal which is not commonly sold through licensed livestock auction markets pursuant to the Livestock Auction Market Act. Such animals shall include, but not be limited to, miniature cattle, miniature horses, miniature donkeys, Barbary sheep, Dall's sheep, alpacas, llamas, pot-bellied pigs, and small mammals, with the exception of cats of the Felis domesticus species and dogs of the Canis familiaris species. The term also includes birds and poultry. The term does not include beef and dairy cattle, calves, swine, bison, sheep sold for wool or food, goats sold for dairy, food, or fiber, and domesticated cervine animals;

(9) Exotic animal auction or swap meet means any event or location as defined in rules and regulations of the department, other than a livestock auction market as defined in section 54-1158, where (a) an exotic animal is purchased, sold, traded, bartered, given away, or otherwise transferred, (b) an offer to purchase an exotic animal is made, or (c) an exotic animal is offered to be sold, traded, bartered, given away, or otherwise transferred;

(10) Exotic animal auction or swap meet organizer means a person in charge, as identified by rule and regulation of the department, of organizing an exotic animal auction or swap meet event, and may include any person who: (a) Arranges events for third parties to have private sales or trades of exotic animals; (b) organizes or coordinates exotic animal auctions or swap meets; (c) leases out areas for exotic animal auctions or swap meets; or (d) provides or coordinates other similar arrangements involving exotic animals;

(11) Exposed means being part of a herd which contains or has contained an animal infected with a disease agent which affects livestock or having had a reasonable opportunity to come in contact with an infective disease agent which affects livestock;

(12) Herd means any group of livestock maintained on common ground for any purpose or two or more groups of livestock under common ownership or supervision geographically separated but which have an interchange of livestock without regard to health status;

(13) Livestock means cattle, swine, sheep, horses, mules, goats, domesticated cervine animals, ratite birds, and poultry;

(14) Poultry means domesticated birds that serve as a source of eggs or meat and includes, but is not limited to, chickens, turkeys, ducks, and geese;

(15) Program disease means a livestock disease for which specific legislation exists for disease control or eradication;

(16) Quarantine means restriction of (a) movement imposed by the department on an animal, group of animals, or herd of animals because of infection with, or exposure to, a disease agent which affects livestock and (b) use of equipment, facilities, land, buildings, and enclosures which are used or have been used by animals infected with, or suspected of being infected with, a disease agent which affects livestock;

(17) Ratite bird means any ostrich, emu, rhea, kiwi, or cassowary;

(18) Sale means a sale, lease, loan, trade, barter, or gift;

(19) Surveillance means the collection and testing of livestock blood, tissue, hair, body fluids, discharges, excrements, or other samples done in a herd or randomly selected livestock to determine the presence or incidence of disease in the state or area of the state; and

(20) Veterinarian means an individual who is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine.

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 718, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 870, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 17.

Livestock Auction Market Act, see section 54-1156.